Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.655

Explosives exemption report.

By December 1, 2023, the public records exemptions accountability committee, in addition to its duties in RCW 42.56.140, must prepare and submit a report to the legislature that includes recommendations on whether the exemption created in RCW 42.56.460(2) should be continued, modified, or terminated. No recommendations or action from the committee or the legislature will result in the continuation of the exemption created in RCW 42.56.460(2).

[ 2019 c 125 s 2.]